Florida, session 2026, SB854.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Florida: 21 22 Section 1.âSection 110.1228, Florida Statutes, is amended 23 to read: 24 110.1228âParticipation by small counties, small 25 municipalities, and district school boards located in small 26 counties, and small independent special fire control districts.â 27 (1)âAs used in this section, the term: 28 (a)ââDistrict school boardâ means a district school board 29 located in a small county or a district school board that 30 receives funding pursuant to s. 1011.62(1)(f). 31 (b)ââSmall countyâ means a county that has a population of 32 100,000 or fewer according to the most recent decennial census. 33 (c)ââSmall independent special fire control districtâ means 34 an independent special fire control district as defined in s. 35 191.003 which has fewer than 100 employees and is located within 36 a county in which there is a countywide emergency medical 37 services authority created by special act. 38 (d)ââSmall municipalityâ means an incorporated municipality 39 that has a population of 12,500 or fewer according to the most 40 recent decennial census. 41 (c)ââSmall countyâ means a county that has a population of 42 100,000 or fewer according to the most recent decennial census. 43 (2)âThe governing body of a small county, or small 44 municipality, or a district school board, or small independent 45 special fire control district may apply for participation in the 46 state group health insurance program authorized in s. 110.123 47 and the prescription drug coverage program authorized by s. 48 110.12315 by submitting an application along with a $500 49 nonrefundable fee to the department. 50 (3)âAny costs or savings to the state group health 51 insurance program or the prescription drug coverage program 52 resulting from such participation must shall be passed on to the 53 local government participants and their employees. Such costs or 54 savings must shall be delineated based on the impact to the 55 state, state officers and employees, and local government 56 employers and their employees. 57 (4)âAs a prerequisite to the adoption of an ordinance or 58 resolution for participation in the state group health insurance 59 program and prescription drug coverage program, a small county, 60 small municipality, or district school board, or small 61 independent special fire control district shall issue a request 62 for proposals to provide health insurance and prescription drug 63 coverage. Such request for proposals must shall seek coverages 64 equivalent to those offered currently by the small county, small 65 municipality, or district school board, or small independent 66 special fire control district and coverages equivalent to the 67 state group health insurance program and prescription drug 68 coverage program. Such request for proposals must provide an 69 opportunity for the receipt of competitive proposals from all 70 interested parties without restriction. The small county, small 71 municipality, and district school board, and small independent 72 special fire control district shall review and consider all 73 responsive proposals before prior to the adoption of any 74 ordinance or resolution for participation in the state group 75 health insurance program and prescription drug coverage program. 76 (5)âIf the department determines that a small county, small 77 municipality, or district school board, or small independent 78 special fire control district is eligible to enroll, the small 79 county, small municipality, or district school board, or small 80 independent special fire control district must agree to the 81 following terms and conditions: 82 (a)âThe minimum enrollment or contractual period will be 3 83 years. 84 (b)âThe small county, small municipality, or district 85 school board, or small independent special fire control district 86 must pay to the department an initial administrative fee of not 87 less than $2.61 per enrollee per month, or such other amount 88 established annually to fully reimburse the department for its 89 costs. 90 (c)âTermination of participation of a small county, small 91 municipality, or district school board, or small independent 92 special fire control district requires written notice 1 year 93 before the termination date. 94 (d)âIf participation is terminated, a small county, small 95 municipality, or district school board, or small independent 96 special fire control district may not reapply for participation 97 for a period of 2 years. 98 (e)âSmall counties, small municipalities, and district 99 school boards, and small independent special fire control 100 districts shall reimburse the state for 100 percent of its 101 costs, including administrative costs. 102 (f)âIf a small county, small municipality, or district 103 school board, or small independent special fire control district 104 employer fails to make the payments required by this section to 105 fully reimburse the state, the Department of Revenue or the 106 Department of Financial Services shall, upon the request of the 107 Department of Management Services, deduct the amount owed by the 108 employer from any funds not pledged to bond debt service 109 satisfaction that are to be distributed by it to the small 110 county, small municipality, or district school board, or small 111 independent special fire control district. The amounts so 112 deducted must shall be transferred to the Department of 113 Management Services for further distribution to the trust funds 114 in accordance with this chapter. 115 (g)âThe small county, small municipality, or district 116 school board, or small independent special fire control district 117 shall furnish the department any information requested by the 118 department which the department considers necessary to 119 administer the state group health insurance program and the 120 prescription drug coverage program. 121 (h)âThe small county, small municipality, or district 122 school board, or small independent special fire control district 123 shall adopt the stateâs eligibility rules. 124 (i)âThe small county, small municipality, or district 125 school board, or small independent special fire control district 126 may not participate in the stateâs cafeteria plan that allows 127 for pretax treatment of premium contributions. If pretax 128 treatment is desirable for employees of these participating 129 employers, each employee of a participating employer shall 130 execute a salary reduction agreement with that employer, and 131 each participating employer shall establish its own cafeteria 132 plan. 133 (j)âThe small county, small municipality, or district 134 school board, or small independent special fire control district 135 shall pay monthly premiums in amounts sufficient to cover claims 136 costs, department administrative costs, and third-party 137 administrative costs and provide for adequate reserves and cash 138 flow by contributing 3 monthsâ premiums and costs in advance of 139 the coverage effective date. 140 (6)âIf a small independent special fire control district 141 elects to participate in the state group health insurance 142 program authorized in s. 110.123 and the prescription drug 143 program authorized by s. 110.12315, the department must conduct 144 an actuarial analysis to determine the small independent special 145 fire control districtâs health insurance premiums. Such analysis 146 must be paid for by the small independent special fire control 147 district. 148 (7)âThe provisions of ss. 624.436-624.446 do not apply to 149 the State Group Insurance Program or to this section. 150 Section 2.âDue to the potential cost savings to small 151 independent special fire control districts which may be realized 152 if such districts participate in open enrollment for the 2026 153 2027 fiscal year for the state group health insurance and 154 prescription drug programs, a request for proposals to provide 155 health insurance and prescription drug coverage issued by such 156 district no more than 1 year before the effective date of this 157 act, satisfies the requirements of s. 110.1228(4), Florida 158 Statutes, for such district. 159 Section 3.âTo allow small independent special fire control 160 districts to participate in the 2026-2027 fiscal year open 161 enrollment for the state group health insurance program and 162 prescription drug program, the Department of Management Services 163 must conduct the applicable actuarial analysis for an eligible 164 small independent special fire control district no later than 165 June 1, 2026, if such district notifies the department of its 166 choice to participate in the programs no later than May 5, 2026. 167 Section 4.âThis act shall take effect May 1, 2026.